Utah statutes.
70A-2a-216.   Third-party beneficiaries of express and implied warranties.
A warranty to or for the benefit of a lessee under this chapter, whether
express or implied, extends to any natural person who is in the family or
household of the lessee or who is a guest in the lessee's home if it is
reasonable to expect that such person may use, consume, or be affected by the
goods, and who is injured in person by breach of the warranty.  This section
does not displace principles of law and equity that extend a warranty to or
for the benefit of a lessee to other persons.  The operation of this section
may not be excluded, modified, or limited, but an exclusion, modification, or
limitation of the warranty, including any with respect to rights and remedies,
effective against the lessee is also effective against any beneficiary
designated under this section.
